Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.080

Violation—Penalty.

Every person who is required to make, or to cause to be made, a report pursuant to RCW 26.44.030 and 26.44.040, and who knowingly fails to make, or fails to cause to be made, such report, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1982 c 129 s 10; 1971 ex.s. c 167 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 129: See note following RCW 9A.04.080.